Illinois, session 104th, HB4041.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by adding Section 615.2a as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/15.2a new)8    Sec. 15.2a. Transportation add-on payment for adult day 9service providers.10    (a) Findings. The General Assembly finds the following:11        (1) Transportation services provided by intellectual 12    and developmental disability providers are essential for 13    ensuring individuals with disabilities can access daily 14    programs, community-based supports, employment 15    opportunities, and healthcare appointments. Without 16    adequate transportation, individuals face isolation, 17    missed services, and negative health and developmental 18    outcomes.19        (2) Many of the individuals served by intellectual and 20    developmental disability providers have complex needs that 21    require frequent and specialized transportation 22    accommodations, including vehicles equipped for mobility 23    support and trained staff. For providers operating in   HB4041- 2 -LRB104 13200 KTG 25349 b1    rural and downstate areas of Illinois, the time and 2    distance required to transport individuals are 3    significantly greater, compounding logistical challenges 4    and increasing operational costs. These services are 5    critical for the safety, dignity, and independence of the 6    most vulnerable residents in Illinois.7        (3) Costs are particularly high for rural and 8    downstate providers, where staff may travel long distances 9    across wide service areas to reach individuals, often 10    requiring more time on the road without additional mileage 11    reimbursement. These challenges, combined with the need 12    for specialized equipment and staffing to meet high-acuity 13    needs, place an unsustainable financial burden on 14    providers working to deliver essential care and supports.15    (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, providers of adult day 16services for individuals with developmental disabilities shall 17receive an add-on payment of $1 for transportation, per trip, 18for any distance beyond 15 miles from the adult day service 19program location. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 211, 2026.